Utah statutes.
76-5-405.   Aggravated sexual assault -- Penalty.
(1)  A person commits aggravated sexual assault if:
(a)  in the course of a rape, object rape, forcible sodomy, or forcible sexual
abuse, the actor:
(i)  uses, or threatens the victim with the use of, a dangerous weapon as
defined in Section 76-1-601;
(ii)  compels, or attempts to compel, the victim to submit to rape, object
rape, forcible sodomy, or forcible sexual abuse, by threat of kidnaping,
death, or serious bodily injury to be inflicted imminently on any person; or
(iii)  is aided or abetted by one or more persons;
(b)  in the course of an attempted rape, attempted object rape, or attempted
forcible sodomy, the actor:
(i)  causes serious bodily injury to any person;
(ii)  uses, or threatens the victim with the use of, a dangerous weapon as
defined in Section 76-1-601;
(iii)  attempts to compel the victim to submit to rape, object rape, or
forcible sodomy, by threat of kidnaping, death, or serious bodily injury to be
inflicted imminently on any person; or
(iv)  is aided or abetted by one or more persons; or
(c)  in the course of an attempted forcible sexual abuse, the actor:
(i)  causes serious bodily injury to any person;
(ii)  uses, or threatens the victim with the use of, a dangerous weapon as
defined in Section 76-1-601;
(iii)  attempts to compel the victim to submit to forcible sexual abuse, by
threat of kidnaping, death, or serious bodily injury to be inflicted
imminently on any person; or
(iv)  is aided or abetted by one or more persons.
(2)  Aggravated sexual assault is a first degree felony, punishable by a term
of imprisonment of:
(a)  for an aggravated sexual assault described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii) or (3)(a), not less than 15
years and which may be for life; or
(ii)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the
commission of the aggravated sexual assault, the defendant was previously
convicted of a grievous sexual offense;
(b)  for an aggravated sexual assault described in Subsection (1)(b):
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii) or (4)(a), not less than 10
years and which may be for life; or
(ii)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the
commission of the aggravated sexual assault, the defendant was previously
convicted of a grievous sexual offense; or
(c)  for an aggravated sexual assault described in Subsection (1)(c):
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(c)(ii) or (5)(a), not less than six
years and which may be for life; or
(ii)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the
commission of the aggravated sexual assault, the defendant was previously
convicted of a grievous sexual offense.
(3) (a)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (2)(a)(i), a court
finds that a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (2)(a)(i) is in
the interests of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the
record, the court may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:
(i)  10 years and which may be for life; or
(ii)  six years and which may be for life.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (3)(a) do not apply when a person is
sentenced under Subsection (2)(a)(ii).
(4) (a)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (2)(b)(i), a court
finds that a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) is in
the interests of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the
record, the court may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than six years
and which may be for life.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (4)(a) do not apply when a person is
sentenced under Subsection (2)(b)(ii).
(5) (a)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (2)(c)(i), a court
finds that a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (2)(c)(i) is in
the interests of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the
record, the court may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than three
years and which may be for life.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (5)(a) do not apply when a person is
sentenced under Subsection (2)(c)(ii).
(6)  Imprisonment under this section is mandatory in accordance with Section
76-3-406.
